Nevada, session 83, SB455.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 481.0473 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
481.0473 The Department consists of:
1. A Division of the Office of the Director;
2. A Division of Compliance Enforcement;
3. A Division of [Field] Customer Services;
4. [A Division of Central Services and Records;
5.] A Division of Research and Project Management;
[6.] 5. A Division of Information Technology;
[7. An Administrative Services]
6. A Fiscal Operations Division; and
[8.] 7. A Motor Carrier Division.
Sec. 2. NRS 481.0475 is hereby amended to read as follows:
481.0475 The [Administrative Services] Fiscal Operations
Division shall furnish fiscal, accounting and other administrative
services to the Director and the various divisions, and advise and
assist the Director and the various divisions in carrying out their
functions and responsibilities.
Sec. 3. 1. Any administrative regulations adopted by an
officer or an agency whose name has been changed or whose
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
responsibilities have been transferred pursuant to the provisions of
this act to another officer or agency remain in force until amended
by the officer or agency to which the responsibility for the adoption
of the regulations has been transferred.
2. Any contracts or other agreements entered into by an officer
or agency whose name has been changed or whose responsibilities
have been transferred pursuant to the provisions of this act to
another officer or agency are binding upon the officer or agency to
which the responsibility for the administration of the provisions of
the contract or other agreement has been transferred. Such contracts
and other agreements may be enforced by the officer or agency to
which the responsibility for the enforcement of the provisions of the
contract or other agreement has been transferred.
3. Any action taken by an officer or agency whose name has
been changed or whose responsibilities have been transferred
pursuant to the provisions of this act to another officer or agency
remains in effect as if taken by the officer or agency to which the
responsibility for the enforcement of such actions has been
transferred.
Sec. 4. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)